District of Columbia statutes.
3-2604

Repealed

Duty of Secretary-Treasurer to enforce law; prosecutions; legal services to Board; investigations

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1104(c), 33 DCR 729
1981 Ed., §§ 2-2201 to 2-2220.